Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3204.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The time within which the Cumberland Lodge #14, Fraternal Order of Police
incorporated on March 1, 1976, shall file the reports for the years 1977, 1978, 1979, 1980, 1981,
1982, 1983, 1984, 1985, 1986, 1987, 1988, 1989, 1990, 1991, 1992, 1993, 1994, 1995, 1996, 1997,
1998, 1999, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013,
2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, and 2026 as required
under the provisions of Chapter 6 of Title 7 of the General Laws, 1956, is hereby extended to the
31st day of December, A.D., 2026, if said corporation shall file in the office of the secretary of state
before December 31, 2026, the reports which it should have filed in the said years and shall pay to
the secretary of state the filing fees therefor, having previously thereto paid to the general treasurer
for the use of the state such sum as the attorney general shall decide should be paid by said
corporation as a compromise for the penalty or penalties for its failure to file such reports then the
forfeiture or revocation of the charter of said corporation shall thereupon, to wit, upon the filing of
said reports and the payment of said fees, be vacated and said corporation shall thereupon be
entitled to all of the privileges, benefits and powers and subject to the same duties and liabilities as
though no forfeiture or revocation of its said charter had taken place.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006253
========